Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.015

Enforceability—Evidence—Extent—Filing not required.

(1) A Canadian domestic violence protection order that identifies both a protected individual and a respondent and appears valid on its face is prima facie evidence of its enforceability under chapter 215, Laws of 2021.

(2) A Canadian domestic violence protection order is enforceable only to the extent it prohibits a respondent from the following conduct as ordered by a Canadian court:

(a) Being in physical proximity to a protected individual or following a protected individual;

(b) Directly or indirectly contacting or communicating with a protected individual or other individual described in the order;

(c) Being within a certain distance of a specified place or location associated with a protected individual; or

(d) Molesting, annoying, harassing, or engaging in threatening conduct directed at a protected individual.

(3) Neither filing with the clerk of the court under RCW 26.55.040 nor obtaining an order granting recognition and enforcement under RCW 26.55.030 is required prior to the enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order by a law enforcement officer.

[ 2021 c 215 s 80.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.